Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1877.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1511.2. Pennsylvania Seal of Biliteracy.--(a) Notwithstanding section 2604-B(b)(2)(v), 22 Pa. Code § 4.24 (relating to high school graduation requirements), 4.51 (relating to State assessment system) or 4.51c (relating to project-based assessment) or any law to the contrary, the Department of Education, beginning BEGINNING with the 2026-2027 school year, THE DEPARTMENT shall establish criteria for awarding AND A TOOLKIT FOR SCHOOL ENTITIES TO AWARD A SEAL, TO <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 BE KNOWN AS the Pennsylvania Seal of Biliteracy , to any student GRADUATING FROM HIGH SCHOOL who demonstrates proficiency in English and at least one other foreign WORLD language on approved diplomas . To qualify for the Pennsylvania Seal of Biliteracy SEAL , a student must: (1) Complete all requirements to earn a high school diploma.(2) Meet any English proficiency criteria established by the Department of Education DEPARTMENT . (3) Meet any foreign WORLD language proficiency criteria established by the Department of Education DEPARTMENT . (b) By August 31 of the year following the establishment of criteria for awarding the Pennsylvania Seal of Biliteracy under subsection (a) and each August 31 thereafter, the State Board of Education shall issue a report on the efficacy of the seal, rate of completion among graduating students and recommendations for improvement, including proposed legislation, to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(B) BEGINNING WITH THE 2026-2027 SCHOOL YEAR, A SCHOOL ENTITY THAT AWARDS THE SEAL SHALL:(1) FOR A STUDENT WHO IS AWARDED THE SEAL, NOTE THE SEAL ON THE STUDENT'S HIGH SCHOOL TRANSCRIPT ISSUED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY.(2) BY OCTOBER 31, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 31 THEREAFTER, REPORT THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR:(I) THE NUMBER OF GRADUATING STUDENTS WHO WERE AWARDED THE SEAL.(II) THE NUMBER OF ENGLISH LEARNERS WHO WERE AWARDED THE 20250HB1877PN3292 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SEAL.(III) A LIST OF LANGUAGES FOR WHICH THE SEAL WAS AWARDED. (IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT. (C) BY DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A REPORT ON THE EFFICACY OF THE SEAL TO THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(2).(D) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL OR REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL."SEAL." THE PENNSYLVANIA SEAL OF BILITERACY AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION."WORLD LANGUAGE." AS DEFINED IN 22 PA. CODE § 4.25(D) (RELATING TO LANGUAGES).Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1877PN3292 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223